Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-59] Capital project support.
(a) Without regard to chapter 42F, the private entity or its nonprofit
management entity to which one or more of the facilities of the Maui regional
system has been transferred pursuant to this part may seek funds from the State
for capital expenditures, as that term is defined in section 37-62, for a
transferred facility for each or all of the first ten years of the lease
entered into under section 323F-54. Each year's request for funds shall be
submitted to the director of finance in accordance with procedures and criteria
established by the director and shall be reviewed by the director and
comptroller with pertinent capital planning and expenditure documents and the
capital planning procedures supplied by the private entity or its nonprofit
management entity. The director of finance may include some or all of the
funds requested in the executive budget of the department of health. Any
appropriation made in response to a request shall be subject to the allotment system
generally applicable to all appropriations made by the legislature. The
department of health shall be responsible for transferring the funds allotted
to the private entity or its nonprofit management entity for expenditure.

(b) After the first ten years of the lease
entered into under section 323F-54, the nonprofit management entity and the
private entity shall be responsible for funding all capital expenditures of the
transferred facility.

(c) To qualify to request funds from the State
under this section, the private entity or its nonprofit management entity shall
satisfy all of the standards and conditions set out in section 323F-58(b). In
addition, the transferred facility shall demonstrate that the capital projects
constructed, operated, and maintained with the requested funds will be in
compliance with all federal, state, and county health care planning laws and
rules, land use and zoning laws and rules, environmental laws and rules, and
building and health codes, rules, and regulations. [L 2015, c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next